Hawaii, session 2025, GM1396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 6E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "historic property" to
read as follows:
""Historic property" means any building, structure, object,
district, area, or site, including heiau and underwater site,
[which io] that is over fifty years old[—] and meets the
criteria for being entered into the Hawaii register of historic
places."
SECTION 2. Section 6E-42.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-{-] §6E-42.2 [-}-] Excluded activities for privately-owned
single-family detached dwelling units and townhouses[—]^
residential projects, and nominally sensitive areas. (a) An
application for a proposed project on an existing privately-
owned single-family detached dwelling unit or townhouse shall be
subject to the requirements of section 6E-42 only if the single-
2025-2832 SB15 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
S
ki
C.D. 1
family detached dwelling unit or townhouse is over fifty years
old and [-5-] is:
(1) [is—1-ie^ed] Listed on the Hawaii or national register
of historic places, or both;
S (2) [is—nemiftai-ed] Nominated for inclusion on the Hawaii
or national register of historic places, or both; or
(3) [is—ieeat-ed] Located in a historic district.
(b) An application for a proposed project on an existing
residential property shall be subject to the requirements of
section 6E-42 only if the existing residential property is over
fifty years old and is registered on the Hawaii register of
historic places.
(c) An application for a proposed project in a nominally
sensitive area shall not be subject to the requirements of
section 6E-42.
[ (b-)-] (d) For the purposes of this section:
"Dwelling unit" means a building or portion thereof
designed or used exclusively for residential occupancy and
having all necessary facilities for permanent residency such as
living, sleeping, cooking, eating, and sanitation.
2025-2832 SB15 GDI SMA.docx 2

Page 3 S.B. NO. S..1
C.D. 1
"Nominally sensitive area" means a project area that is
known to include a low density of historic, cultural, or
archaeological resources, or where the project area has been
substantially disturbed by previous excavation or other ground­
disturbing work and no significant historic properties have been
previously identified.
"Single-family detached dwelling unit" means an individual,
freestanding, unattached dwelling unit, typically built on a lot
larger than the structure itself, resulting in an area
surrounding the dwelling.
"Townhouse" has the same meaning as [def-ined] in section
502C-1."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2832 SB15 CDl SMA.docx


S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 15, S.D. 1,H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 15, SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
'1^.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives